_Full_Tex/texmf/tex/generic/hyphen/skhyph.tex
\v d3s4t4v
\v l3s4t4v
m3s4t4v
n3s4t4v
n4t3s4t4v
p3s4t4v
r3s4t4v
r4v5s4t4v
\v s3s4t4v
t3s4t4v
v3s4t4v
\v z3s4t4v
 %predpony
.a2e2ro
.a2e2ro3d2r
.aero3g2r
.a2e2ro3k2l
.aero3p2l
.aero3s2k
.aero3s2t
.aero3t2r
.akcie3s2c2h
.ane3s2teti
.ane3s2t\'ez
.anti5k4l
.anti5k4r
.apo5p4le
.ap4rio
.ap4ri\'o
.arci5k4
.aristo5k4
.as3k2lep
.austro5s4
.bac2k3hand
.balne2o3
.belo5
.belo5h4
.bez5
.bez5b4
.bez5d4
.bez5h4
.bez5k4
.bez5m4
.bez5p4
.bez5s4
.bez5t4
.bez5v4
.bez5z4
.bielo5
.bielob4
.bieloh4
.bielov4
.bi2o5
.biok4
.biop4
.bios4
.blaho5
.blahop4
.blahos4
.bledo5
.boha5p4
.boho5s4
.bo\v ze5
.bo\v ze5d4
.bo\v zec2h4
.brato5v4r
.b2z2d
.c\'aro5v4ra
.celo5d4
.celo5k4
.celo5p4
.celo5s4
.celo5u4
.ceno5t4
.ces2t5maj
.cirkevno5
.cirkevno5p4
.c4t4n
.cudzo5k4
.cudzo5o4
.cudzo5s4
.cudzo5t4
.cudzo5v4
.cyto5p4
.\v caro5k4
.\v caro5s4
.\v caro5v4
.\v caro5z4
.\v cerno5b4
.\v cerno5h4
.\v cerno5k4
.\v cerno5o4
.\v cerveno5a4
.\v cerveno5b4
.\v cerveno5h4
.\v cerveno5k4
.\v cerveno5o4
.\v cerveno5p4
.\v cierno5b4
.\v cierno5h4
.\v cierno5o4
.\v co5ch4
.\v co5s4
.\v cudo5t4
.da3k2d
.\v datelino5t4
.de5f4
.de5g4
.dek4l
.desa\v t5
.de5\v s4t2
.dez5i2
.dez5o2
.dis2k3d4
.divo5t4
.dlho5h4
.dlho5p4
.dobro5d4
.dobro5p4
.dobro5s4
.do5\v c2m
.do5d4
.do5f4
.do5h4
.do5c4h4
.do5i4
.do5k4
.do5o
.do5p4
.do5s4
.do5\v s4p
.do5\v s4tie
.do5\v s4t\'i
.do5t4l
.do5t4m
.do5t4r
.do5t4v
.do5u
.do5v4
.do5z4
.do5\v z4
.drevo5p4
.drevo5o
.drevo5v4
.drobno5z4
.druho5s4
.dvoj5al
.dvoj5\v c4
.dvoj5d4
.dvoj5h4
.dvoj5i4
.dvoj5k4
.dvoj5p4
.dvoj5s4
.dvoj5t4
.dvoj5u
.dvoj5v4
.dvoj5z4
.elektro5
.ex5k4
.fol2k5
.foto5
.gala5p4
.gama5g4
.ge4o
.hnedo5o
.hnedo5u
.holo5b4
.holo5h4
.holo5k4
.hore5z4
.horno5u4
.hr\^ozo5s4t4
.hr\^ozo5v4
.hr\^ozy5p4
.hrubo5s4
.hydro5
.chorobo5p4
.jasno5o
.jasno5z4
.jedno5h4
.jedno5i4
.jedno5p4
.jedno5s4
.jedno5u4
.jedno5z4
.juho5a
.juho5s4
.ju\v zno5s4
.kata5k4
.kata5s4t4
.kme\v no5t4
.koso5d4
.koso5\v s4
.koso5u
.krivo5p4
.kruto5v4
.krvi5p4
.krvi5s4
.krvi5t4
.ktovie5a2
.l\'asky5p4
.lesos4
.\v l4s4t
.\v ludovo5u
.makro5k4
.makro5o4
.makro5s4
.m\'alo5k4
.malo5o
.m\'alo5v4
.m\'arno5t4
.medzi5h4
.medzi5i4
.medzi5p4
.medzi5\v s4
.medzi5t4
.melo5d4
.meru5\^o2
.miesto5d4
.miesto5p4
.mikro5e4
.mikro5k4
.mikro5o
.mikro5p4
.mimo5\v s4
.mimo5\'u
.mimo5v4
.mnoho5s4
.mnoho5t4
.mnoho5u
.mnoho5v
.mnoho5z
.modro5o
.mrako5d4
.mravo5u
.mucho5t4
.m4z4d
.na5a4
.na5b4
.na5c4
.nad5h4
.na5d4nes.
.nad5p4
.na5d4p4.
.na5d4\'r4.
.na5d4robno.
.na5h4
.na5i4
.na5k4
.na5m4
.na5o4
.na5p4
.n\'a5p4
.n\'arodno5o
.na5s4
.na5st4
.n\'a5s4
.n\'a5st4
.na5\v s4
.na5\v sk4
.na6\v s5sk
.na5t4
.na5u4
.na5\'u4
.n\'a5u4
.n\'a5\'u4
.na5v4l
.na5v4na
.na5v4r4
.n\'a5v4r4
.na5v4z4
.na5z4r
.na5z4v
.na6z5vy\v s
.n\'az5v4
.na5\v z4
.ne5a4
.ne5do3u2k
.ne5e4
.ne5i4
.ne5m4
.ne5na5h4
.ne5na5i4
.ne5na5k4
.ne5na5m4
.ne5na5p4
.ne5na5s4
.ne5na5t4
.ne5p4
.ne5s4
.ne6s5tor
.ne5\v s4
.ne5t4
.ne6t5t
.ne5u2
.ne5\'u2
.ne5v4
.ne5z4d4r
.ne5z4d4v
.ne5z4l
.ne5z4m
.ne5z4n
.ne5z4r
.ne5z4v
.nie5k4
.ni5k4
.ni6k5to\v s
.n\'izko5k4
.novo5u2
.novo5z2
.obi5d4
.ob5k4
.obo5s4
.obo5z4
.ob5s4
.ob5t4
.ob5z4
.od5b4
.od5c4
.od5d4
.od5f4
.od5h4
.od5c4h4
.od5i4
.od6i5\'o
.od5\'i4
.od5k4
.odo5b4
.odo5h4
.odo5k4
.odo5m4k4
.odo5p4
.odo5s4
.od5p4
.od5s4
.od5\v s4
.od5t4
.od5v4
.od5z4
.t4v4r
.o5h4l
.o5h4\v l
.o5h4na
.o5h4n\'u
.o5h4r
.o5c4h4
.o5k4l
.o5k4\v l
.okolo5i
.okolo5s4
.o5k4ra
.o5k4r\'a
.o5k4resa\v t
.o5k4res\'ava\v t
.o5k4ri
.o5k4r\'i
.o5k4ru
.o5k4r\'u
.o5m4l
.o5m4n
.o5m4r
.o5p4
.o6p5lan
.o6p5rat
.o5s4lab
.o5s4lad
.o5s4lav
.o5s4l\'av
.o5s4lep
.o5s4lo
.o5s4p4
.o5s4tar
.o5s4ta\v t
.o5s4tan
.o5s4ta\v n
.o6s5tatn
.o5s4tatok
.o5s4tatk
.o5s4t\'av
.o5s6to5
.o5s6t4rap
.ostro5u
.o5s4ved
.o5s4vetl
.o5s4viet
.o5s4vie\v z
.o5s4vit
.o5s4voj
.o5\v s4k4
.o5\v s4\v l4
.o5\v s4m4
.o5\v s4p4
.o5\v s4v4
.o5t4ras
.o5t4rav
.o5t4r\'av
.o5t4rep
.o5t4ria
.o5v4dov
.o5v4l\'ad
.o5v4la\v z
.o5v4p4
.o5v4r
.o5z4l4
.o5z4n
.o5z4re
.o5z4v4l
.p\"a\v t5izbo
.plno5a
.plno5p4
.plno5\v s4
.plno5kr4
.plocho5d4
.po5b4
.po5\v c4
.poda5k4
.pod5b4r
.pod5h4
.pod5c4h
.pod5k4
.pod5p4
.po5d4r\'a\v z
.po5d4rep
.pod5re
.po5d4rh
.po5d4rie
.po5d4rm
.po5d4rv
.po5d4r4\v z
.pod5s4ko\v c
.pod5v4
.pod3zem
.pod3zol
.pod3\v za
.pod3\v zu
.po5h4
.po6h5reb
.po5c4h4
.po5i4
.po5k4
.pol5d4
.pol5i4z
.polo5a
.polo5b4
.pol5o4bl\'u
.polo5d4
.polo5h4l
.polo5i
.polo5k4
.polo5m4
.polo5o4
.polo5p4
.polo5s4
.polo5t4
.polo5u4
.polo5\'u4
.polo5v4
.polo5z4
.pol5s4t
.po5m4
.po6m5n\'ik
.po5o4
.po5ob4h
.po5ob4l
.po5s4
.po6s4t5s4k4rip
.po6s5tul
.po5\v s4
.po6\v s5ta
.po6\v s5tov
.po6\v s5v
.po5t4k4n
.po5t4\v l
.po5t4r
.poroz5p4
.poroz5s4
.poroz5v4
.po6st5g4r
.po6s5ti
.po5t4
.po5u
.po5v4
.po4v5ra
.povy5h4
.povy5k4
.povy5p4
.povy5s4
.povy5v4
.povy5z4
.po5v4z4b
.po5z4
.pra5o4
.pra5p4
.pravicovo5o
.pra5v4l
.pra5v4nu
.pra5v4n\'u
.pr\'a5vo5p4
.pra5vo5s4
.pre5b4
.pre5c4
.pred5c4
.pred5h4
.pred5ch4
.pred5i
.pred5k4
.pred5m4
.predo5h4
.pred5op
.pred5ostatn
.pred5p4
.pre5d4rah
.pre5d4rap
.pre5d4ra\v t
.pre5d4ra\v z
.pre5d4ri
.pre5d4r\v z
.pred5s4
.pred5v4
.pred5z4
.pre5\v c4
.pre5e2
.pre5f2
.pre5h4
.pre5c4h4
.pre5i4
.pre5k4
.pre6k5vap
.pre5m4
.pre5o4
.pre5p4
.pre5s4
.pre6s5n
.pre5\v s4
.pre5t4
.pre5v4
.pre5z4
.pre5\v z4
.pri5b4
.pri5\v c4
.pri5d4
.pri5h4
.pri5c4h4
.pri5k4
.pr\'i5k4
.pri5m4
.pri5p4
.pri5s4
.pr\'i5s4
.pr\'i6s5p
.pri6s5p
.pri5s4p\^o
.pri5\v s4
.pri6\v s5la.
.pri6\v s5li.
.pri6\v s5lo.
.pri5t4
.pri5v4
.pri5z4
.pri5\v z4
.re5g4
.re5k4
.re6k5v
.re5p4
.re6p5n
.re5\v s4
.re5t4
.ro4z5i4
.ro6z5\'i4
.rozo5b4
.rozo5d4
.rozo5c4h4
.rozo5m4
.rozo5p4
.rozo5r4
.rozo5s4
.rozo5\v s4
.rozo5z4
.rozo5\v z4
.ro6z5u4
.ro6z5v4
3s4polu5
3s4polu5h4
3s4polu5p4
3s4polu5v4
.\v sikmo5o
.\v siroko5
.\v siroko5p4
.\v st\'ato5
.\v st4vor5
.su4b5s4
.s\'u5h4
.s\'u5k4r
.s\'u5m4r
.s\'u5s4
.s\'u5v4
.s\'u5z4
.troj5
.t4v4r4do5
.viac5k4
.viac5v4
.vide2o5
.vn\'utro5s4
.vn\'utro5\v s4
.vo5p4ch
.vo5p4r
.vo5s4p
.vo5t4
.vo5v4
.vy5
.v\'y5
.vy5b4
.vy5c4
.v\'y5c4
.vy5\v c4
.v\'y5\v c4
.vy5d4
.v\'y5d4
.vy5h4
.vy6h5\v n
.vy6h5ne
.v\'y5h4
.vy5c4h4
.vy5k4
.v\'y5k4
.vy5m4
.vy5p4
.v\'y5p4
.vy5s4
.v\'y5s4
.vy5\v s4
.vy6\v s5\v s
.v\'y6\v s5k
.vy5t4
.v\'y5t4
.vy5v4
.vy5z4
.v\'y5z4
.za5b4
.z\'a5b4
.za5c4
.za5\v c4
.za5d4
.za5h4
.za5c4h4
.za5k4
.za5m4
.za5p4
.za5r4
.za5s4
.za5\v s4
.za5t4
.za5v4
.za5z4
.za5\v z4
.z\'a5k4
.z\'a5z4
.zo5b4
.zo6d5p
.zo5d4r
.zo5d4v
.zo5h4
.zo5m4l
.zo5m4r
.zo5s4
.zo5\v s4
.zo5t4
.zo5v4
.zo5z4
.zo5\v z4
 % slovn\'e z\'aklady
5alkohol
auto4rk
auto4rs
5b4lah
5b4ledn
5b4lesk
5b4lok
5b4l\'ud
5b4lysk
5b4lysn
5boh3vi4e3a2k
5boh3vi4e3o2d3k
5boh3z4
5boles4t5n
5b4ra\v t
5b4r\'azd
5b4rec2h
5b4ronz
5b4ru\v c
5b4r\'us
5b4r\'yzg
5c4muk
5c4nie
5c4vak
5c4vi\v c
5c4vik
\v c\'i6s5lov
5\v c4len
5\v c4l\'ank
5\v c4l\'anok
5\v c4lov
5d4\v nov
5d4ramat
5d4ra\v t
5d4van\'as4\v t5
5d4vih
5d4vi\v z
5d4voj
5d4vor
5e2u2r\'op
5f4\v lak
5f4lias
5f4ranc\'u
5f4rekven
5f4r\'az
5g4raf
5g4ram
pro6g5ram
5g4r\'e\v c
5g4rob
5g4vardej
5h4lad
5h4las
5h4lav
5h4\v lad
5h4liad
5h4luch
5h4mat
5h4mot
5h4na\v t
5h4ned
5h4nev
5h4niezd
5h4noj
5h4nut
5h4n\'u\v t
5h4n\'ut
5h4rab
5h4r3mot
5h4ran
5h4ra\v t
5h4rob
5h4rom
5h4roz
5h4rub
5h4ryz
5h4viezd
5c6h4lap
5c6h4leb
5c6hran
5c6h4r\'an
5c6h4r\'a\v n
5c6h4v\'al
5c6h4v\'at
5c6h4vat
5c6h4vost
5jeden\'as4t5k
5jeden\'as4\v t5
5k4lad
5k4la\v d
5k4\v lak
5k4lam
5k4l\'as\v t
5k4liat
5k4lia\v t
5k4lep
5k4les
5k4\v l\'u\v c
5k4resb
5k4res\v t
5k4ritic
5k4r\'idl
5k4r\^och
5k4ruh
5k4r\'u\v z
5k4ryt
5k4valif
5k4valit
5k4vet
5k4vadr
5m4ladis4t3v
5m4no\v z
5m4rav
5m4r\'az
na5d4\v z4ga
na5d4\v z4g\'a
nav3\v s4tev
n\'av3\v s4tev
nav3\v s4t\'iv
5p4l\'an
5p4lastik
5p4lat
5p4lav
5p4leta
5p4letie
5p4let\'u
5p4lies\v t
5p4ne2umat
5p4r\'av
s6pr\'av
5p4riam
5p4rirod
5p2ris\'am
5p4roduk
5s4f\'er
5s4c2hopn
5s4k4lad
5s4k4lon
5s4ko\v c
5s4kok
5s4kop
5s4kor
5s4k\^or
5s4k4romne
5s4k4rot
5s4k4r\'uc
5s4k4rutk
5s4k4r\'yv
5s4k\'usen
5s4kuto\v c
5s4k4v\'uc
5s4ladk
5s4lav
5s4l\'av
5s4led
5s4lep
5s4lovn
5s4love
5s4lova
5s4lovk
5s4luh
5s4l\'u\v z
5s4\v lub
5s4ma\v z
5s4mel
5s4mer
5s4piev
5s4pev
5s4por
5s4potreb
5s4p4ravod
5s4p4raved
5s4p4r\'avn
5s4p4ravo
5s4tarost
5s4tatic
5s4tav
5s4t4rach
5s4t4ran
5s4t4r\'an
5s4t4r\'ada
5s4t4ra\v s
5s4t2rat
5s4t2red
5s4t2rek
5s4t4rel
5s4t4re\v l
5s4t4riel
5s4t4rie\v l
5s4t4rih
5s4t4ri\v z
5s4t4rom
5s4t4r\'uh
5s4t4run
5s4t4ru\v z
5s4tati
5d2ve5s4to
5t2ri5s4to
5\v s4tyri5s4to
5p\"a\v t5s4to
5\v ses4\v t5s4to
5sedem5s4to
5osem5s4to
5dev\"a\v t5s4to
5p\"a\v t5
5\v ses4\v t5
5s4t4la
5s4tup
5s4ved
5\v s4\v lah
5\v s4liap
5\v s4kola
5\v s4k4rab
5\v s4k4rie
5\v s4pin
5\v s4p4liech
5\v s4print
5\v s4tart
5\v s4t\'at
5\v s4tep
5\v s4t\'it
5\v s4t4rukt\'ur
5\v s4tude
5\v s4tudo
5\v s4t4vera
5\v s4t4vorec
5\v s4tyli
5\v s4\v tast
5\v stiep4
5\v s4t4v4r4\v t5k4
5\v s4t4v4r4\v t5l4
5\v s4t4v4r4\v t5r4
5\v s4t4v4r4\v t5s4
5t4la\v c
5t4lak
5t4ran4s5
5t4ras
5t4resk
5t4retin
5t4ried
5t4rub
5t4r4vaj
5t4r4val
5t4r4van
5uholn\'ik
5uho\v ln
5viac5h4
5v4\v cera
5v4l\'ad
5v4las
5v4r\'as
5v4rav
5v4rat
5v4r\'at
5v4\v simn
5v4t\'ak
5v4tip
5vy5s4t4r\'aja
5v4z4du
5v4z4\v tah
5v4z4\v ta\v z
5z4lom
5z4lu\v c
5z4mysel
5z4mysl
5z4nak
5z4n\'am
5z4n\'a\v sa
5z4rak
5z4v\"az
5z4vest
5zv4es\v t
5z4vod
5z4vuk
5z4vu\v c
5\v z4r\'a\v c
5\v z4rane
5\v z4reb
5\v z4r\'ut
 %za\v ciatky slov
.cv6
.ch6
.sp6
.st6
.\v sk6
.\v sp6
.\v st6
.tk6
.uh6
.uc6h6
.uk6
.um6
.up6
.us6
.\'us6
.usc6h6
.\'usc6h
.usk6
.\'usl6
.usm6
.\'usm6
.\'us7ta.
.\'us7tami.
.\'us7to\v c
.\'us7ti
.ust6l
.\'ust7ny
.ust6r
.\'us7tret
.us7t4ric
.\'us6t6r
.\'u\v s6
.ut6
.uv6
.uz6
.vd6
.vh6
.vk6
.vp6
.vs6
.v\v s6
.vt6
.vz6
.vzh6
.vzk6
.vzl6
.vzp6
.v\v z6
.zb6
.zd6n
.zd6r
.zd6v
.zg6
.zh6
.zm6
.zr6
.zv6
 %koncovky
4b4s4\v t.
8c4h.
8d4z.
8d4\v z.
4c4ht4.
4j4s4\v t.
4lt.
4m4p4r.
4m4p4s.
4m4\v s4t.
4n4k4t.
4p4r4v.
4rd.
r4p4t.
r4\v s4\v c.
r4t4z.
4st.
4s\v t.
5k4r\'at.
5s4to5k4r\'at.
5t4\v l4c4\v t.
 %cudzie slov\'a
akci3a2
akv\'ari3u2m
gymn\'azi3um
le2u3k\'emia
t2ri3u2mf
kli3e2nt
}
 % List of exceptions  created by Karel Horak
 % (Mathematical Institute of Czechoslovak Acadamy of Science)
 % Prague, April 1, 1991
 %
\hyphenation{
dos\v t me-t\'o-da me-t\'o-dy ne-do-stat-ka-mi sep-tem-bra
}
\endinput
%% 
%% End of file `skhyphen.tex'.
